Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1723
Seller-assisted marketing plan; sale, lease, or offer; occurs; when.

(1) An offer to sell or offer to lease a seller-assisted marketing plan shall occur in this state whenever:

(a) The offer to sell or offer to lease is made in this state;

(b) The purchaser resides in this state at the time of the offer; or

(c) The offer to sell or offer to lease either originates from this state or is directed by the seller or lessor to this state and received at the place to which it is directed.

(2) A sale or lease of a seller-assisted marketing plan shall occur in this state whenever:

(a) The offer to sell or offer to lease is accepted in this state;

(b) The purchaser resides in this state at the time of the sale; or

(c) The acceptance is communicated to a seller situated in this state.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 23.